Utah statutes.
31A-26-209.   Form and contents of license.
(1)  Licenses issued under this chapter shall be in the form the commissioner
prescribes and shall set forth:
(a)  the name, address, and telephone number of the licensee;
(b)  the license classifications under Section 31A-26-204;
(c)  the date of license issuance; and
(d)  any other information the commissioner considers advisable.
(2)  An adjuster doing business under any other name than the adjuster's legal
name shall notify the commissioner prior to using the assumed name in this
state.
(3) (a)  An organization shall be licensed as an agency if the organization
acts as:
(i)  an independent adjuster; or
(ii)  a public adjuster.
(b)  The agency license issued under Subsection (3)(a) shall set forth the
names of all natural persons licensed under this chapter who are authorized to
act in those capacities for the organization in this state.
